Massachusetts, session 194th, H2979.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 in the official 2016 edition is hereby amended in subparagraph
(g), under "Group 2" by inserting therein the words, "Forensic Scientists employed at the
Massachusetts State Police Crime Laboratory;" after the words, "head guard and chief of
waterfront police".
of 1